Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-407.05
Policies issued on or after operative date of law; default in premium payment other than on policy anniversary; cash surrender value; paid-up nonforfeiture benefit.

Any cash surrender value and any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, available under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment due at any time other than on the policy anniversary, shall be calculated with allowance for the lapse of time and the payment of fractional premiums beyond the last preceding policy anniversary. All values referred to in sections 44-407.02 to 44-407.04, 44-407.08, 44-407.09, and 44-407.24, may be calculated upon the assumption that any death benefit is payable at the end of the policy year of death. The net value of any paid-up additions, other than paid-up term additions, shall be not less than the amounts used to provide such additions. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 44-407.02, additional benefits payable (a) in the event of death or dismemberment by accident or accidental means, (b) in the event of total and permanent disability, (c) as reversionary annuity or deferred reversionary annuity benefits, (d) as term insurance benefits provided by a rider or supplemental policy provision to which, if issued as a separate policy, sections 44-407 to 44-407.09 and 44-407.24 to 44-407.26 would not apply, (e) as term insurance on the life of a child or on the lives of children provided in a policy on the life of a parent of the child, if such term insurance expires before the child's age is twenty-six, is uniform in amount after the child's age is one, and has not become paid up by reason of the death of a parent of the child, and (f) as other policy benefits additional to life insurance and endowment benefits, and premiums for all such additional benefits, shall be disregarded in ascertaining cash surrender values and nonforfeiture benefits required by said sections, and no such additional benefits shall be included in any paid-up nonforfeiture benefits unless specifically included by the terms of the policy.

Laws 1943, c. 106, § 5(5), p. 366;

R.S.1943, § 44-407.05;

Laws 1959, c. 206, § 4, p. 722;

Laws 1961, c. 222, § 3, p. 663;

Laws 1965, c. 262, § 7, p. 739;

Laws 1981, LB 355, § 7.